Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2790.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Whereas gender discrimination is wrong,
And whereas the female body should not be stigmatized or fetishized,
Therefore MGL chapter 272 section 16 shall be amended to remove the words "female
breasts",
And equality of chest baring shall be the new law in Massachusetts.
of 1